Washington statutes.
RCW 19.77.150

Remedies of registrants.

Any registrant may proceed by suit to enjoin the manufacture, use, display, or sale of any counterfeits or colorable imitations of a trademark registered under this chapter, and any court of competent jurisdiction may grant an injunction to restrain such manufacture, use, display, or sale as may be by the said court deemed just and reasonable, and may require the defendants to pay to such registrant all profits derived from and/or all damages suffered by reason of such wrongful manufacture, use, display, or sale; and such court may also order that any such counterfeits or colorable imitations in the possession or under the control of any defendant in such case be delivered to an officer of the court, or to the registrant, to be destroyed. The court, in its discretion, may enter judgment awarding reasonable attorneys' fees and/or an amount not to exceed three times such profits and damages in such cases where the court finds the other party committed the wrongful acts in bad faith or otherwise as according to the circumstances of the case.

The enumeration of any right or remedy herein shall not affect a registrant's right to prosecute under any penal law of this state.

[ 2003 c 34 s 6; 1989 c 72 s 11; 1955 c 211 s 15.]